Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1333
County employee changed by law to judge; vesting of prior service retirement benefits; vested benefits.

Any county employee who is a member under a county employees retirement system and whose status as a county employee is changed by the Legislature to that of a judge shall, upon application to the Public Employees Retirement Board and to the county, obtain full and immediate vesting in any prior service retirement benefits and any future service retirement benefits which have been accrued to the date of transfer, except that the employee may not withdraw the amount in his employee account prior to his retirement and still receive such vested benefits. Any such employee shall be eligible for immediate participation in the Nebraska Retirement Fund for Judges.

Laws 1973, LB 573, § 2.